California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected to the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his position due to a change in status making him ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, disqualification, or resignation, shall be filled, for the unexpired portion of the term, by a majority vote of the commission. However, the person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the member whose office he is to fill. Qualifications of any person to fill a vacancy on the commission shall be certified, in writing, to the director. The director shall notify the commission if he or she determines that any such person is not qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72057.

A producer member and his or her alternate on the commission shall be an individual, partner, or employee of a producer who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, wheat for market. Not more than two such members shall be persons employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business organization and not more than one member in any one district shall be so employed or connected. Qualification as a producer member shall continue during the entire term of office.

A handler member and his or her alternate on the commission shall be an individual, or a partner or employee of a handler, who has a financial interest in handling wheat for market.

The public member or his alternate on the commission, shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member on the commission. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the wheat industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72058.

The term of office of all commissioners, except any ex officio member, shall be for three years from the date of their election and until their successors are qualified and elected. However, of the first producer members of the commission, five shall serve for one year, five shall serve for two years, and five shall serve for three years, with the determination of term of each member to be made by lot at the time of election. Terms of office of each commissioner shall be limited to four consecutive terms, except that any member selected to serve a one-year term or a two-year term may serve one additional three-year term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 20.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72059.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state, and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72060.

A quorum of the commission shall be a majority of the commissioners. Except as provided in Sections 72027 and 72133, the vote of a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 469, Sec. 3.   (AB 735)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

72061.

The director or his representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72062.

No commissioner or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each commissioner, except the ex officio member, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission may receive a sum of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission, for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission, together with the necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72063.

All moneys received by any person from the assessments levied under the authority of this chapter or otherwise received by the commission, shall be deposited in such banks as the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through such agent or agents as it may designate for that purpose. Any agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business as such in the State of California, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72064.

The commission shall defend any of its members against any claims made or actions taken against any commission members on matters in which the members acted on behalf of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72065.

The state shall not be liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission shall be limited to the funds collected by the commission. No member of the commission or alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, shall be personally liable on the contracts of the commission nor shall a commissioner, alternate member, or employee of the commission be responsible individually in any way to any producer, handler, or any other person for error in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No commissioner or alternate member shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any member of the commission. The liability of the commissioners shall be several and not joint, and no commissioner shall be liable for the default of any other commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [72081. - 72081.]

72081.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) To adopt, and from time to time, alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, and orders for carrying out the provisions of this chapter, including rules for regulation of appeals from any bylaw, rule, regulation, or order of the commission.

(b) To administer and enforce this chapter, and to do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with or deemed reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of the purposes of this chapter.

(c) To appoint its own officers, including a chairman, one or more vice chairmen, and such other officers as it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(d) To employ a person to serve, at the pleasure of the commission, as chief executive officer of the commission and other personnel, including legal counsel, that is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The commission may retain a management firm or any staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state to perform the functions prescribed by this subdivision under the control of the commission. If the chief executive officer engages in any conduct which the director determines is not in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter, the director shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. In the event that the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the director, the director may suspend or discharge the chief executive officer.

(e) To fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(f) To appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. 

(g) To establish offices and incur expenses, and to enter into any and all contracts and agreements, and to create such liabilities and borrow such funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary, in the opinion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(h) To keep accurate books, records and accounts of all of its dealings, which books, records and accounts shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the director. The audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all producers and handlers of wheat, copies of which shall also be submitted to the Legislature and the Department of Food and Agriculture. In addition, the director may, as he determines necessary, conduct, or cause to be conducted, a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(i) To promote the sale of wheat by advertising and other promotional means, including cost-sharing advertising, for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for wheat and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses of the several varieties and the healthful properties and nutritional value of wheat.

(j) To appoint an advisory committee composed of handlers to aid the commission in its deliberations.

(k) To make, in the name of the commission, contracts to render service in formulating and conducting plans and programs, and such other contracts or agreements as the commission may deem necessary for the promotion of the sale of wheat. 

(l) To conduct and contract with others to conduct scientific research, including the study, analysis, dissemination, and accumulation of information obtained from this research or elsewhere respecting cultural and production practices, marketing, and distribution of wheat. In connection with research, the commission shall have the power to accept contributions of, or to match, private, state, or federal funds that may be available for those purposes, and to employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies conducting the research.

(m) To publish and distribute, without charge, a bulletin or other communication for dissemination of information relating to the wheat industry to producers and handlers.

(n) To establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(o) To establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the director prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 72081.

(p) To educate and instruct wheat customers and buyers with respect to proper methods of handling and selling wheat, to make market surveys and analyses, to present facts to, and negotiate with, state, federal and foreign agencies on matters which affect the marketing of wheat, and to maintain and expand present markets and create new markets for wheat.

(q) The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for criminal violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 21.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [72091. - 72099.]

72091.

Within 90 days after January 1, 1983, the director shall establish a list of producers eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the director shall require that handlers, county agricultural commissioners, and wheat producers in this state submit the names, mailing addresses, and district numbers of all wheat producers. The request for this information shall be in writing. The list shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice.

Any producer of wheat, whose name does not appear upon the director’s list of producers affected, may have his name established on the list by filing with the director a signed statement, identifying himself as a producer. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the producer from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72092.

The provisions of this chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the director finds, in a referendum conducted by the director, that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the director pursuant to Section 72091, participate, and either of the following:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum, and the producers so voting marketed a majority or more of the total quantity of wheat in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum, voted in favor of the provisions of this chapter.

(b) A majority or more of the producers who voted in the referendum, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of wheat in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum, voted in favor of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72093.

The director shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe any additional procedure that may be necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the director may extend the period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72094.

Failure to receive a ballot shall not invalidate the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72095.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in Section 72092, he shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all producers and handlers whose names and addresses may be on file with the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72096.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in Section 72092, he shall so certify and declare all provisions of this chapter inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72097.

Upon certification of the commission, the director shall contact all producers in each district by mail, or call meetings of producers in each district, for the purpose of nominating and electing persons for appointment to the commission by the director. All producers on the director’s list shall be given written notice of the election meetings at least 15 days prior to the meeting date.

Upon certification of the commission, the director shall establish a list of handlers and shall, by mail or calling a meeting of all handlers, conduct the nomination and election of handlers for appointment to the commission by the director. All handlers on the director’s list shall be given written notice of any nomination or election meetings at least 15 days prior to the meeting date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72097.5.

To be eligible for election to the commission, producer nominees shall present to the director a nomination petition with the signatures of at least six eligible producers from the district from which the nominee is seeking election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72098.

Subsequent to the first election of commissioners under this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to the nomination and election procedures which shall be established by the rules and regulations adopted by the commission with concurrence of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72099.

Prior to the referendum vote conducted by the director pursuant to Section 72092, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the director such amount as the director may deem necessary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote.

Any unused funds in carrying out the provisions of Section 72092 shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the director.

Upon establishment of the commission, the commission is authorized to reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the director and which were used in carrying out the provisions of Section 72092, and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [72101. - 72109.]

72101.

The commission shall, not later than April 30 of each year, establish the assessment for the following year beginning May 1 and ending April 30. In no event shall the combined assessment of the commission and any other state authorized wheat production research and market program exceed 1 percent of the gross dollar value of the year’s sale of wheat by all producers to handlers.

The commission shall establish producer gross dollar value through rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 22.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72103.

Every handler shall keep a complete and accurate record of all wheat received by him or her and the name of the producer whose wheat was shipped. The records shall be in simple form and contain such information as the commission shall prescribe. The records shall be preserved by the handler for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72104.

All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the director from handlers and all lists of producers in the possession of the director shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in a judicial proceeding. Information on volume shipments, crop value, and any other related information which is required for reports to governmental agencies; financial reports to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information; and any other such information which the handlers request from the commission to receive in total, excluding individual handler information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72105.

Assessments provided for in this article shall be upon the producer. The handler first handling the wheat being assessed shall deduct the assessments from amounts paid by him to the producer and shall be a trustee of the funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72106.

Every handler shall be personally liable for the payment of the collected assessments, and failure of the handler to collect the assessment from any producer shall not exempt any handler from liability for payment of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72107.

Any assessment which is levied as provided for in this chapter, is a personal debt of every producer so assessed. Failure of a handler to make payment of the collected assessment to the commission shall not relieve the producer of this obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72108.

Any producer or handler who fails to file a return or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of such assessment determined to be due and, in addition, 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72109.

Any person, firm, or corporation subject to the assessment in this chapter may request a total or partial refund of a paid assessment from the commission. No refund shall be made by the commission unless requested within 90 days from the date of collection of the assessment. However, the commission may extend that period upon a showing of good cause. The refund of assessment shall be made by the commission within 60 days of the date of the request for the refund. The commission shall establish procedures and provide forms for each request, shall maintain complete records, and shall ensure confidentiality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [72111. - 72112.5.]

72111.

It shall be a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or by both the fine and imprisonment, for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully to render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) When engaged in the shipping of wheat or in the wholesale or retail trade of wheat, to fail or refuse to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom he has received wheat and the quantity so received.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72112.

The commission shall adopt regulations for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations an informal hearing before the commission, or before a committee of the commission designated for this purpose. Appeals from decisions the commission made after the hearing may be made to the director. The determination of the director shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

72112.5.

The commission may commence civil actions and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties, and for the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance, respecting this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other rule or regulation of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. No bond shall be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief. A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified by Section 485.010 is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or of inadequate remedy at law specified by Section 526 or 527 is not required.

Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the commodity subject to this chapter until there is full compliance with and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable verdict for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorneys’ fees and other related costs. Venue for the actions may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 23.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation, Suspension, and Termination [72131. - 72135.]

72131.

Between May 1, 1987, and April 30, 1988, the commission shall cause a referendum to be conducted among producers in the manner prescribed in Section 72131.5 to determine whether the operation of this chapter shall be reapproved and continued effective. If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given, he or she shall so certify and this chapter shall remain effective. If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the current marketing season ending April 30, 1988. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 72134. No bond or security shall be required for any such referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 24.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72131.5.

The operation of this chapter shall be reapproved and continued in effect if the director finds, in the referendum required pursuant to Section 72131, that a majority of the eligible producers voting in the referendum, voted in favor of continuing the operation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 25.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72132.

Following a favorable referendum conducted prior to April 30, 1988, a referendum shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter between May 1 and April 30, following procedures provided by this chapter and Section 72131.5, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of an industry petition pursuant to Section 72133. In that case the referendum shall be every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 26.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72133.

Upon the finding of a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the director that the operation of this chapter shall be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season. The director shall, upon receipt of the recommendation, or may upon a petition filed with him requesting the suspension, signed by 15 percent of the producers by number who produced not less than 15 percent of the volume in the immediately preceding season, and after a public hearing, cause a referendum to be conducted among the listed producers to determine if the operation and the operations of the commission shall be suspended. However, the director shall not cause a referendum to be conducted as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes. The director shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 nor more than 60 days in duration. The director is authorized to prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the director shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the director, participate in the referendum, the director shall suspend the operation of this chapter, if he or she finds either one of the following:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers so voting marketed a majority or more of the total quantity of wheat marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) That a majority or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and that the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of wheat marketed in the preceding season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 27.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72133.5.

(a) The director shall terminate the commission at the end of the current marketing season if requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers who are directly affected and who produce at least 51 percent of the volume of the product.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the director in a manner that establishes the date a request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name for the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the director. The signatures to the petition requesting the termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall add to his or her signature his or her place of business, giving the street and number. If no street and number exist, then a designation of the place of business shall be given which will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(c) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 28.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72134.

After the effective date of suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the operations of the commission, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and any and all moneys remaining held by the commission, collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding current marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to those persons, any moneys remaining and any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate state or federal program involved in activities authorized in this chapter. If no such program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust moneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1004, Sec. 28.5.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

72135.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers and handlers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. California Navel Orange Commission [73001. - 73356.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [73001. - 73006.]

73001.

The navel orange industry in this state constitutes one of California’s principal tree fruit crops, and thus provides an important source of employment for many people in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73002.

Opportunity exists for continued growth and expansion of the industry by creating new markets in this country and abroad. The success of an expansion program is uniquely dependent upon effective advertising and promotion, since the creation of new markets and increased per capita consumption are essentially a matter of educating people to the use of highly nutritious navel oranges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73003.

The creation of a California Navel Orange Commission is necessary for the efficient development and management of an advertising and promotion program and essential to ensure that the California navel orange industry can compete successfully in the world marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73004.

The production and marketing of navel oranges produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73005.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of advertising, promotion, and marketing research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73006.

No action taken by the commission, nor by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under the chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Fair Trade Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16900) of that Part 2), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [73051. - 73070.]

73051.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73052.

“Navel orange” means those oranges belonging to the genus Citrus, species sinensis (Linnaeus) Osbeck, and characterized by being seedless and having a navel at the apex, commonly known as navels and marketed for fresh consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73053.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 209.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

73054.

“Carton” means a container holding approximately 40 pounds, or the equivalent thereof, of navel oranges marketed for fresh consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73055.

“Commission” means the California Navel Orange Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73056.

“Commissioner” means any member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73057.

“Consumer communications” means, as defined by the commission, all manner of advertising and other communications which are directed towards the general consuming public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73058.

“Cooperative handler” means a handler organized under this code and the Capper-Volstead Act (Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 291) of Title 7 of the United States Code) who markets fruit for producer members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73059.

“Cooperative producer” means a producer who markets his or her fruit through a cooperative handler.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73060.

“Director” means the Director of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73061.

“Districts” mean the following:

(a) District A consists of the Counties of Fresno, Madera, Butte, Colusa, Glenn, Merced, Placer, Shasta, Solano, Sonoma, Stanislaus, Sutter, Tehama, Yolo, Yuba, and all other counties not included in Districts B, C, D, E, and F.

(b) District B consists of that portion of Tulare County located between the northern boundary of Tulare County and a straight east-west line made up and defined by Avenue 384.

(c) District C consists of that portion of Tulare County located between Avenue 384, and a straight east-west line made up and defined by Avenue 232.

(d) District D consists of that portion of Tulare County located between Avenue 232 and the southern boundary of Tulare County.

(e) District E consists of Kern County.

(f) District F consists of the Counties of Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, San Luis Obispo, Imperial, Los Angeles, Mono, Orange, Santa Barbara, and Ventura.

The boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the commission, which is concurred in by the director, to maintain similar total production among the districts and to ensure proper representation by producers. The boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73062.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73063.

“Handle” means to engage in the business of a handler.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 494, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

73064.
